Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 2
RECALL OF COUNTY OFFICERS

30-10-201 to 30-10-210. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was numbered as article 2 of chapter 35, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 2 prior to its repeal in 1993, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to the recall of officers, see part 1 of article 12 of title 1.